Hawaii statutes.
[§607-15.5] Attorneys' fees in tort
actions. In all tort actions in which a judgment is entered by a court of
competent jurisdiction, attorneys' fees for both the plaintiff and the
defendant shall be limited to a reasonable amount as approved by the court
having jurisdiction of the action. In any tort action in which a settlement is
effected, the plaintiff or the defendant may request that the amount of their
respective attorneys' fees be subject to approval of the court having
jurisdiction of the action. [L Sp 1986, c 2, §11]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next